Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.571

Intimidating any administrator, faculty member, or student by threat of force or violence unlawful—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, singly or in concert with others, to intimidate by threat of force or violence any administrator, faculty member, or student of any university, college, or community or technical college who is in the peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2015 c 55 s 204; 2003 c 53 s 172; 1971 c 45 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 98 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.76.601.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1971 c 45: See note following RCW 28B.10.570.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 98: See note following RCW 28B.10.570.